src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k11x_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hógvur
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: hógv
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: hógvi
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: hós
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hógvurin
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hógvin
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [hógvinum, hónum]
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: hósins
